Utah statutes.
16-7-10.   Death of bishop, trustee, not incorporated -- Succession to
property.
In case of the death, resignation or removal of any such archbishop, bishop,
president, trustee in trust, president of stake, president of congregation,
overseer, presiding elder or clergyman who at the time of his death,
resignation or removal was holding the title to trust property for the use or
benefit of any church or religious society, and was not incorporated as a
corporation sole, the title to any and all such property held by him, of every
nature and kind, does not revert to the grantor nor vest in the heirs of such
deceased person, but shall be deemed to be in abeyance after such death,
resignation or removal until his successor is duly appointed to fill such
vacancy, and upon the appointment of such successor the title to all the
property held by his predecessor shall at once, without any other act or deed,
vest in the person appointed to fill such vacancy.
